Washington statutes.
RCW 36.27.050

Special emoluments prohibited.

No prosecuting attorney shall receive any fee or reward from any person, on behalf of any prosecution, or for any of his or her official services, except as provided in this title, nor shall he or she be engaged as attorney or counsel for any party in any action depending upon the same facts involved in any criminal proceeding.

[ 2009 c 549 s 4048; 1963 c 4 s 36.27.050. Prior: 1888 p 189 s 1; 1886 p 62 s 12; 1883 p 74 s 17; Code 1881 s 2164; 1879 p 94 s 12; 1877 p 248 s 13; 1863 p 409 s 8; 1860 p 335 s 7; 1858 p 13 s 8; 1854 p 417 s 7; RRS s 4138.]